Washington statutes.
RCW 35.54.070

Use of fund—Purchase of bonds, coupons and warrants.

Defaulted bonds, interest coupons and warrants against local improvement funds shall be purchased out of the guaranty fund, and as between the several issues of bonds, coupons, or warrants no preference shall exist, but they shall be purchased in the order of their presentation.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.54.070. Prior: 1933 c 109 s 1, part; 1927 c 209 s 3, part; 1925 ex.s. c 183 s 3, part; 1923 c 141 s 3, part; RRS s 9351-3, part.]